Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 51

Unlawful Representations

62-51-101. Posing as being licensed or bonded — Penalty.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, it is unlawful for any individual, firm, association or corporation to advertise or otherwise claim to be licensed or bonded to perform any service unless local, state or federal law, in fact, requires licensing or bonding to perform the service, and the person is so licensed or bonded. A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1986, ch. 790, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The misdemeanor provisions in this section may be affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Chapters 52-75

[Reserved]